Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 4, chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Sections 1  to 3 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2017,  are repealed on
January 2, [ 2027] 2033.
(2) Notwithstanding the date specified in subsection (1) of this section, eligible rental  property
that is granted exemption under an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to section  1 [ of this
2017 Act ], chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2017,  before the date specified in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall continue to receive the exemption under the provisions  of the ordinance or resolution for
the period of time for which the exemption was granted.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2078 (HB 2078-INTRO) Page 1